Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 9.7
MASS TRANSPORTATION

Section

32-9.7-101. Definitions.

For purposes of this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Mass transportation project" means any project which transports the general public by bus, rail, air, high occupancy vehicle lane, or any other means of conveyance provided for in article 9 of this title.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1320, § 1, effective August 8.

32-9.7-102. Mass transportation account.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a mass transportation account which shall consist of all of the unexpended revenues collected by the board of the transit construction authority as of August 1, 1989, which revenues were collected pursuant to the authority of such board to impose assessments on property or persons. Such revenues shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit into a separate interest-bearing mass transportation account for the construction of mass transportation projects in the corridors from which such funds were collected. The expenditure of such funds shall only be made with the approval of the general assembly. Any other use of these funds shall require a two-thirds majority vote of both houses of the general assembly. The mass transportation account created in this section shall accumulate interest and shall be kept separate from all other accounts in the state treasury, and it shall be identified separately from all other revenues in the state treasury. All reports, studies, plans, documents, books, financial records, audits, and any other information compiled by the transit construction authority shall be transferred to the director of research of the legislative council, and such information shall be identified separately from all other information relating to mass transportation issues and shall be made available to the public upon request.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1320, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

The transit construction authority was terminated on August 1, 1989. See chapter 291, Session Laws of Colorado 1989.

Cross references:

For the appropriation made from the mass transportation account to the corrections expansion reserve fund, see § 17-1-117, as said section existed prior to its repeal in 2000.